Maryland, session 2025, HB1246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–118.1.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(II) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(2) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS THROUGH A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER IS SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, WHEN
CALCULATING AN INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S CONTRIBUTION TO THE INSURED’S OR
ENROLLEE’S COINSURANCE, COPAYMENT, DEDUCTIBLE, OR OUT–OF–POCKET
MAXIMUM UNDER THE INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, AN
ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE ANY DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE
MADE BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE INSURED OR ENROLLEE FOR A PRESCRIPTION
DRUG:
(I) THAT IS COVERED UNDER THE INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN; AND
(II) 1. THAT DOES NOT HAVE AN AB–RATED GENERIC
EQUIVALENT DRUG OR AN INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT PREFERRED
UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN’S FORMULARY; OR
2. A. THAT HAS AN AB–RATED GENERIC
EQUIVALENT DRUG OR AN INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT PREFERRED
UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN’S FORMULARY; AND

HOUSE BILL 1246 3
B. FOR WHICH THE INSURED OR ENROLLEE ORIGINALLY
OBTAINED COVERAGE THROUGH PRIOR AUTHORIZATION, A STEP THERAPY
PROTOCOL, OR THE EXCEPTION OR APPEAL PROCESS OF THE ENTITY SUBJECT TO
THIS SECTION.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, THIS
SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF THE
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN.
(C) (1) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
A PERSON THAT PROVIDES A DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT,
PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE MADE BY OR ON BEHALF
OF THE INSURED OR ENROLLEE THAT IS USED IN THE CALCULATION OF THE
INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S CONTRIBUTION TO THE INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S
COINSURANCE, COPAYMENT, DEDUCTIBLE, OR OUT–OF–POCKET MAXIMUM SHALL:
(I) WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER THE ACCEPTANCE OF THE DISCOUNT,
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER
OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE, NOTIFY THE INSURED OR ENROLLEE OF:
(I) 1. THE MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT OF THE DISCOUNT,
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER
OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE; AND
(II) 2. THE EXPIRATION DATE FOR THE DISCOUNT,
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER
OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE FOR THE
DURATION OF THE PLAN YEAR.
(2) A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS A
VIOLATION OF THE CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES A DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT,
PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE TO AN INSURED OR
ENROLLEE.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY SET, ALTER,
IMPLEMENT, OR CONDITION THE TERMS OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN COVERAGE,

HOUSE BILL 1246
INCLUDING THE BENEFIT DESIGN, BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON INFORMATION
ABOUT THE AVAILABILITY OR AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL OR PRODUCT ASSISTANCE
AVAILABLE FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED
TO PROHIBIT AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION FROM USING REBATES IN THE
DESIGN OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE OR BENEFITS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or after
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.